Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 5 Natural Gas Competition and Deregulation
46-4-155.
Regulation of unbundled services; peaking service; customer services; interstate capacity assets.

Except as otherwise provided by this article, an electing distribution company which offers firm distribution service remains subject to the jurisdiction of the commission under this title. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the commission shall have general supervision of such company pursuant to Code Section 46-2-20, and the rates of an electing distribution company for firm distribution service and the ancillary services which are subject to the rate jurisdiction of the commission shall be established in accordance with the provisions of this article and Code Section 46-2-23.1.

An electing distribution company shall offer liquefied natural gas peaking service to marketers at rates and on terms approved by the commission, subject however to the following:

If a marketer which is not affiliated with an electing distribution company obtains a peaking service in a delivery group from a person other than the electing distribution company, the rate for liquefied natural gas peaking service by the electing distribution company in such delivery group shall not be subject to approval by the commission but shall be capped at 120 percent of the rate for such service previously established by the commission; and

If the commission determines pursuant to a filing by the electing distribution company or otherwise, and based upon the factors listed in subsection (c) of this Code section, that reasonably available alternatives for such peaking services exist in the delivery group, the rate for such services in a delivery group shall not be subject to regulation by the commission and the plant and equipment of the electing distribution company which is used and useful for receiving gas for liquefaction, liquefying gas, storing liquefied natural gas, and re-gasifying liquefied natural gas, including the land upon which such plant and equipment is located, shall be removed from the rate base for rate-making purposes of the electing distribution company in an amount which is the lower of the fair market value or the depreciated book value of such facilities. In addition, the rates for firm distribution service of the electing distribution company shall be adjusted to eliminate any applicable recovery of the operation and maintenance expenses associated with such facilities and gas in storage in such facilities, as well as the return on investment attributable to the amount removed from the rate base. For purposes of such review and determination, the fact that such services have been obtained by a marketer which is not affiliated with the electing distribution company shall create a presumption that there are reasonably available alternatives for such peaking services in the delivery group.

An electing distribution company shall offer each type of customer service to marketers at rates and on terms approved by the commission in accordance with this article and Code Section 46-2-23.1 until such time as the commission determines that marketers have reasonably available alternatives to purchasing such service from the electing distribution company. The commission shall make a separate determination for each type of service. In making such determinations, the commission shall consider the following factors:

The number and size of alternative providers of the service;

The extent to which the service is available from alternative providers in the relevant market;

The ability of alternative providers to make functionally equivalent or substitute services readily available at competitive prices, terms, and conditions; and

Other indicators of market power which may include market share, growth in market share, ease of entry, and the affiliation of providers of a service.

For each delivery group for which the commission has not determined pursuant to Code Section 46-4-156 that adequate market conditions exist, and thus has not initiated customer assignment, an electing distribution company shall:

Offer interruptible distribution service and balancing services at rates and on terms approved by the commission in accordance with the provisions of this article and Code Section 46-2-23.1 to retail customers and marketers, subject to the rules, regulations, and general terms and conditions of the electing distribution company as approved by the commission;

Offer firm distribution service at rates and on terms approved by the commission in accordance with the provisions of this article and Code Section 46-2-23.1 to retail customers and marketers, subject to the rules, regulations, and general terms and conditions of the electing distribution company as approved by the commission; and

Offer in conjunction with such firm distribution service a commodity sales service; provided, however, that the rates for such commodity sales service shall be established pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 46-2-26.5, relating to the filing and adoption of a gas supply plan; and provided, further, that the rates for such commodity sales service shall not be subject to the provisions of Code Section 46-2-26.5 nor subject to the approval of the commission if at least five marketers, excluding any marketer which is an affiliate of the electing distribution company, have been granted certificates of authority to serve in the delivery group.

As used in this subsection, the term “interstate capacity assets” means interstate transportation and out-of-state gas storage capacity.

If, pursuant to the provisions of this article, the rates for commodity sales service of an electing distribution company within a delivery group or groups become no longer subject to the approval of the commission nor to the provisions of Code Section 46-2-26.5, the electing distribution company nevertheless shall continue to be responsible for acquiring and contracting for the interstate capacity assets necessary for gas to be made available on its system, whether directly or by assignment to marketers, for firm distribution service to retail customers within such delivery group or groups unless determined otherwise by the commission in accordance with this subsection.

At least every third year following the date when the rates for commodity sales service within a delivery group or groups become no longer subject to commission approval nor to the provisions of Code Section 46-2-26.5, the electing distribution company shall file, on or before August 1 of such year, a capacity supply plan which designates the array of available interstate capacity assets selected by the electing distribution company for the purpose of making gas available on its system for firm distribution service to retail customers in such delivery group or groups.

Not less than ten days after any such filing by an electing distribution company, the commission shall conduct a public hearing on the filing. The electing distribution company’s testimony shall be under oath and shall, with any corrections thereto, constitute the electing distribution company’s affirmative case. At any hearing conducted pursuant to this subsection, the burden of proof to show that the proposed capacity supply plan is appropriate shall be upon the electing distribution company.

Following such a hearing, the commission shall issue an order approving the capacity supply plan filed by the electing distribution company or adopting a capacity supply plan for the electing distribution company that the commission deems appropriate. Should the commission fail or refuse to issue an order by the ninetieth day after the electing distribution company’s filing which either approves the capacity supply plan filed by the electing distribution company or adopts a different capacity supply plan for the electing distribution company, the capacity supply plan proposed by the electing distribution company shall thereupon be deemed approved by operation of law.

Any capacity supply plan approved or adopted by the commission shall:

Specify the range of the requirements to be supplied by interstate capacity assets;

Describe the array of interstate capacity assets selected by the electing distribution company to meet such requirements;

Describe the criteria of the electing distribution company for entering into contracts under such array of interstate capacity assets from time to time to meet such requirements; provided, however, that a capacity supply plan approved or adopted by the commission shall not prescribe the individual contracts to be executed by the electing distribution company in order to implement such plan; and

Specify the portion of the interstate capacity assets which must be retained and utilized by the electing distribution company in order to manage and operate its system.

When interstate capacity assets that are contained in a capacity supply plan approved or adopted by the commission are allocated by the electing distribution company to a marketer pursuant to the provisions of this article, all of the costs of the interstate capacity assets thus allocated shall be borne by such marketer.

The provisions of law relating to parties, intervention, and discovery in proceedings before the commission shall apply with respect to proceedings under this subsection.

All commission orders issued pursuant to this subsection shall contain the commission’s findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which the commission’s action is based. Any such order shall be deemed a final order subject to judicial review under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

Prior to the approval or adoption of a capacity supply plan pursuant to this subsection, the interstate capacity assets of the electing distribution company in the most current gas supply plan of such company approved or adopted by the commission pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 46-2-26.5 shall be treated as a capacity supply plan that is approved or adopted by the commission for purposes of this subsection.

After a capacity supply plan has become effective pursuant to provisions of this subsection as a result of a proceeding before the commission, the commission shall retain jurisdiction of the proceeding for the purposes set forth in this subsection. Upon application of the affected electing distribution company or upon its own initiative, the commission may, after affording due notice and opportunity for hearing to the affected electing distribution company and the intervenors in the proceeding, amend the capacity supply plan of the affected electing distribution company. Any such amendment shall not adversely affect rights under any contract entered into pursuant to such plan without the consent of the parties to such contracts. If an amendment proceeding is initiated by the affected electing distribution company and the commission fails or refuses to issue an order by the ninetieth day after the electing distribution company’s filing, the amended capacity supply plan proposed by the electing distribution company shall thereupon be deemed approved by operation of law.

After an electing distribution company has no obligation to provide commodity sales service to retail customers pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 46-4-156 and upon the petition of any interested person and after notice and opportunity for hearing afforded to the electing distribution company, all parties to the most current proceeding establishing a capacity supply plan for such electing distribution company, all marketers who have been issued a certificate of authority pursuant to Code Section 46-4-153, and all owners or operators of interstate gas pipelines that are a part of said capacity supply plan, the commission may issue an order eliminating the responsibility of the electing distribution company for acquiring and contracting for interstate capacity assets necessary for gas to be made available on its system as well as the obligation of such electing distribution company to file any further capacity supply plans with the commission pursuant to the provisions of this subsection, if the commission determines that:

Marketers can and will secure adequate and reliable interstate capacity assets necessary to make gas available on the system of the electing distribution company for service to firm retail customers;

Adequate, reliable, and economical interstate capacity assets will not be diverted from use for service to retail customers in Georgia;

There is a competitive, highly flexible, and reasonably accessible market for interstate capacity assets for service to retail customers in Georgia;

Elimination of such responsibility on the part of the electing distribution company would not adversely affect competition for natural gas service to retail customers in Georgia; and

Elimination of such responsibility on the part of the electing distribution company is otherwise in the public interest.

If the commission eliminates the responsibility of an electing distribution company for acquiring and contracting for interstate capacity assets and filing further capacity supply plans in accordance with this subsection, the commission shall annually review the assignment of interstate capacity assets.

Notwithstanding any other provisions in this Code section to the contrary, no later than July 1, 2003, the commission shall, after notice afforded to the electing distribution company, all marketers who have been issued a certificate of authority in accordance with Code Section 46-4-153, and all owners or operators of interstate gas pipelines that are a part of said capacity supply plan, hold a hearing regarding a plan for assignment of interstate assets. After such hearing, the commission may adopt a plan for assignment of interstate capacity assets held by the electing distribution company, except for those interstate capacity assets reasonably required for balancing. If adopted, the plan shall provide for interstate capacity assets to be assigned to certificated marketers who desire assignment and who are qualified technically and financially to manage interstate capacity assets. Marketers who accept assignment of interstate capacity assets shall be required by the commission to use such assets primarily to serve retail customers in Georgia and shall be permitted to use such assets outside Georgia so long as the reliability of the system is not compromised. Thereafter, the commission shall annually review the assignment of interstate capacity assets.

Any order eliminating the responsibility of the electing distribution company for acquiring and contracting for interstate capacity assets pursuant to paragraph (12) of this subsection and any plan for assignment of interstate capacity assets pursuant to paragraph (13) of this subsection shall, at a minimum, ensure that:

Shifts in market share are reflected in an orderly reassignment of interstate capacity assets;

Marketers hold sufficient interstate capacity assets to meet the needs of retail customers;

Before any such assignment is authorized, the assignee demonstrates to the commission that such assignment will result in financial benefits to firm retail customers;

Before any marketer discontinues service in the Georgia market, it assigns its contractual rights for interstate capacity assets used to serve Georgia retail customers in a manner designated by the commission;

In the event that the commission imposes temporary directives in accordance with Code Section 46-4-157, interstate capacity assets assigned to marketers are subject to reassignment by the commission to protect the interests of retail customers; and

Any other requirement that the commission finds to be in the public interest is imposed upon assignees as a condition of the assignment of interstate capacity assets.

After notice and an opportunity for hearing, the commission may authorize, subject to reasonable terms and conditions, an electing distribution company or its designee to utilize or monetize excess interstate capacity assets available to the electing distribution company.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-155

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 11; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 37/SB 148.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, in subsection (e), added “unless determined otherwise by the commission in accordance with this subsection” at the end of paragraph (e)(2), substituted “ninetieth day” for “forty fifth day” in the last sentence of paragraphs (e)(5) and (e)(11), in paragraph (e)(12), in the first sentence, deleted “and” preceding “all marketers” and inserted “and all owners or operators of interstate gas pipelines that are a part of said capacity supply plan,” and added the last undesignated paragraph, and added paragraphs (e)(13) through (e)(15).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (e), deleted “or the consumers’ utility counsel division of the Governor’s Office of Consumer Affairs” following “Upon application of the affected electing distribution company” near the beginning of the second sentence of paragraph (e)(11), deleted “the consumers’ utility counsel division of the Governor’s Office of Consumer Affairs,” following “such electing distribution company,” near the middle of the introductory language of paragraph (e)(12), and deleted “the consumers’ utility counsel division of the Governor’s Office of Consumer Affairs,” following “after notice afforded to the electing distribution company,” near the beginning of paragraph (e)(13).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

46-4-156.
Customer assignment methodology; commission determination of adequate market conditions and effect of such determination; lost and unaccounted for gas; notice to customers; petition proceedings; change of marketers; deposit.

No later than December 31, 1997, the commission shall promulgate regulations which prescribe a methodology for the random assignment to each marketer certificated within a delivery group of each firm retail customer who has not contracted for distribution service from a marketer. This methodology shall further provide that the percentage of such firm retail customers assigned to a given marketer shall be based upon the percentage at the time of such assignment of all firm retail customers within the delivery group served by such marketer.

Any person may file a petition requesting that the commission determine, or the commission on its own motion may determine, that adequate market conditions exist for a particular delivery group. If, after a proceeding on such petition or motion, the commission makes such a determination, the procedures that precede customer assignment shall begin. The commission shall enter a decision as to whether adequate market conditions exist within the earlier of 120 days after the close of the record in the proceeding on such petition or motion or 180 days from the filing of such petition or the making of such motion under this subsection. The commission shall determine that adequate market conditions exist within a specific delivery group based upon consideration of the following factors:

The number and size of alternative providers of the distribution service;

The extent to which the distribution service is available from alternative providers in the delivery group;

Subject to subsection (d) of this Code section and provided that all initial assignments of rights to intrastate capacity for firm distribution service, interstate pipeline, and underground storage by an electing distribution company to marketers, as necessary for marketers to initiate service to all firm retail customers with which they have contracted or to which they have been assigned as provided for in this Code section, whether by allocation pursuant to a tariff approved under paragraph (3) or (4) of subsection (c) of Code Section 46-4-154 or by contract, are effective pursuant to the terms of such tariff or contract and, provided, further, that all initial assignments of rights under firm wellhead gas supply contracts by an electing distribution company to marketers, as necessary for marketers to initiate service to all firm retail customers with which they have contracted or to which they have been assigned as provided for in this Code section, by allocation pursuant to a tariff approved under Code Section 46-4-154 are effective pursuant to the terms of such tariff, an electing distribution company has no obligation to provide commodity sales service to retail customers.

Other indicators of market power which may include market share, growth in market share, ease of entry, and the affiliation of providers of a distribution service.

If the commission issues an order pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section determining that adequate market conditions exist, it shall prescribe in such order the contents of notices to be furnished pursuant to the provisions of subsection (e) of this Code section. Subject to the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section, on the one hundred twentieth day following the issuance of an order for a particular delivery group:

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, the rates and terms of service of an electing distribution company for interruptible distribution service and balancing service shall not be subject to approval by the commission, provided that all firm retail customers have contracted with or have been assigned to marketers as provided for in this Code section;

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, rates and terms of service for commodity sales service provided by an electing distribution company to retail purchasers of firm distribution service shall not be subject to approval by the commission, provided that all firm retail customers have contracted with or have been assigned to marketers as provided for in this Code section;

Subject to subsection (d) of this Code section and provided that all initial assignments of rights to intrastate capacity for firm distribution service, interstate pipeline, and underground storage by an electing distribution company to marketers, as necessary for marketers to initiate service to all firm retail customers with which they have contracted or to which they have been assigned as provided for in this Code section, whether by allocation pursuant to a tariff approved under paragraph (3) or (4) of subsection (d) of Code Section 46-4-154 or by contract, are effective pursuant to the terms of such tariff or contract and, provided, further, that all initial assignments of rights under firm wellhead gas supply contracts by an electing distribution company to marketers, as necessary for marketers to initiate service to all firm retail customers with which they have contracted or to which they have been assigned as provided for in this Code section, by allocation pursuant to a tariff approved under Code Section 46-4-154 are effective pursuant to the terms of such tariff, an electing distribution company has no obligation to provide commodity sales service to retail customers; and

The commission is authorized to provide by order, after notice and hearing, for the allocation of the cost of lost and unaccounted for gas among interruptible and firm retail customers.

If the one hundred twentieth day following the issuance of such order falls during a winter heating season, the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section and customer assignment shall become effective on the day following the end of the winter heating season.

Within 45 days following the issuance of an order pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, and again within 80 days following such an order, an electing distribution company shall send a notice regarding the commission’s order to each of its retail customers receiving firm distribution service or commodity sales service within such delivery group. Such notices shall inform the retail customer in plain language that:

The electing distribution company will not provide firm distribution service or commodity sales service to such customer, as of the date determined under subsection (c) or (d) of this Code section;

Such customer may contract with a marketer certificated under Code Section 46-4-153 to furnish such services; and

If the customer does not contract with a marketer within 100 days from the date of such order, the commission will assign, on a random basis, a marketer to furnish such services to said customer.

At any time that the electing distribution company determines that any deadline or the expiration of any time period prescribed by this article may result in an adverse impact upon the overall effective implementation of this article, upon the emergence of effective competition, or upon the public interest, it may petition the commission to extend such deadline or period for a time certain.

If, in response to such a petition or on its own motion, the commission finds that strict enforcement of any deadline or time period prescribed by this article may result in an adverse impact upon the overall effective implementation of this article, upon the emergence of effective competition, or upon the public interest, it may extend such deadline or period for any period of time up to or equal to the time extension requested in the petition or proposed in the motion.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a consumer shall be authorized to change marketers at least once a year without incurring any service charge relating to such change to an alternative marketer. No marketer shall charge any consumer a service charge relating to a change to an alternative marketer if such consumer has not changed marketers within the previous 12 months. Except as otherwise provided in a legally binding contract between the marketer and the consumer, no marketer shall require a notice period from a consumer if a consumer elects to change service to an alternative marketer. The commission shall investigate methods to expedite the electing distribution company’s processes for switching consumers to the consumers’ preferred marketer and may enter appropriate orders to expedite switching consumers.

A marketer may require a deposit, not to exceed $150.00, from a consumer prior to providing gas distribution service to such consumer. A marketer is not authorized to require an increase in the deposit of a consumer if such consumer has paid all bills from the marketer in a timely manner for a period of three months. A marketer shall refund to any consumer who is not currently delinquent on payments to the marketer any deposit amount exceeding $150.00 within 30 days following April 25, 2002. In any case where a marketer has required a deposit from a consumer and such consumer has paid all bills from the marketer in a timely manner for a period of six months, the marketer shall be required to refund the deposit to the consumer within 60 days. In any event, a deposit shall be refunded to a consumer within 60 days of the date that such consumer changes marketers or discontinues service, provided that such consumer has satisfied all of his or her outstanding financial obligations to the marketer.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-156

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 153, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1084, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1206, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 12.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, substituted “subsection (c)” for “subsection (d)” near the middle of paragraph (b)(3); in subsection (c), substituted “Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, the” for “The” at the beginning of paragraph (c)(1), in paragraph (c)(2), substituted “Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection,” for “The” at the beginning and deleted “and” from the end, substituted “; and” for a period at the end of paragraph (e)(3), and added paragraph (e)(4); in subsection (g), substituted “consumer” for “retail customer” in the first sentence and added the last three sentences; and in subsection (h), substituted “consumer” for “retail customer” throughout, in the first sentence, inserted “, not to exceed $150.00,” and substituted “consumer” for “customer; provided, however, that such deposit cannot exceed 100 percent of the customer’s average monthly bill based on past customer usage and current marketer prices”, added the second and third sentences, substituted “consumer” for “customer” twice in the present fourth sentence, and, in the last sentence, substituted “such consumer” for “a retail customer” and substituted “that such consumer” for “the retail customer”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, “April 25, 2002” was substituted for “the effective date of this subsection” at the end of the third sentence in subsection (h).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Natural Gas Marketers’ Terms of Service, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia Public Service Commission, Gas Utilities, Chapter 515-7-9.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to O.C.G.A. §

46-4-156

, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 273 (2001).

For note on the 2001 amendment to O.C.G.A. §

46-4-156

, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 277 (2001).

46-4-157.
Temporary directives.

If, in an expedited hearing pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act”:

The commission determines for a specific delivery group, as to which the commission has issued an order pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 46-4-156, that the prices for natural gas paid by firm retail customers in such delivery group are not constrained by market forces and are significantly higher than such prices would be if they were constrained by market forces; or

The commission determines for a specific delivery group, as to which the commission has not issued an order pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 46-4-156, that the prices charged by an electing distribution company to consumers for commodity sales services, which prices have not been approved by the commission pursuant to Code Section 46-2-26.5, are generally not constrained by market forces and are significantly higher than such prices would be if they were constrained by market forces,

then the commission, on an emergency basis, may by order temporarily impose such directives on gas companies subject to its jurisdiction as are required to protect the interests of firm retail customers in such delivery group including but not limited to price regulations and the imposition upon the electing distribution company of the obligation to serve retail customers in such delivery group under the same or similar conditions to those under which such customers were served prior to customer assignment in such delivery group. In no event shall such emergency directives extend beyond the first day of July immediately following the next full annual session of the General Assembly after the imposition of such directives. In its order the commission shall provide for recovery of all costs reasonably incurred by the electing distribution company in complying with the directives. Any such directives shall be drawn as narrowly as possible to accomplish the purpose of protecting the public on an interim basis. No such directive shall impose any condition upon the electing distribution company which unreasonably burdens the company. Such directives shall be immediately reviewable in the Superior Court of Fulton County in the same manner and subject to the same procedures as the review of any other contested case under the provisions of Code Section 50-13-19.

If, in an expedited hearing pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” the commission makes any of the determinations described in subsection (c) or (d) of this Code section, the commission may, on a temporary basis, by order impose on marketers such directives as are required to protect the interest of firm retail customers in a specific delivery group, including but not limited to price regulations. In no event shall such emergency directives extend beyond the first day of July in the year immediately following imposition of such directives. Any such directives shall be drawn as narrowly as possible to accomplish the purpose of protecting the public on an interim basis. Such directives shall be immediately reviewable in the Superior Court of Fulton County in the same manner and subject to the same procedures as the review of any other contested case under the provisions of Code Section 50-13-19.

Upon determination by the commission that market conditions are no longer competitive, the commission may impose directives as described in subsection (b) of this Code section. For purposes of this subsection, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that market conditions are not competitive if more than 90 percent of firm retail customers in a specific delivery group are served by three or fewer marketers; provided, however, that marketers who are affiliates shall be deemed to be one marketer for purposes of this subsection.

Upon determination by the commission, based upon a standard previously adopted by rule of the commission, that prices paid by firm retail customers for natural gas in a specific delivery group are not constrained by market forces and are significantly higher than such prices would be if they were constrained by market forces, the commission may impose directives as described in subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-157

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1084, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1206, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 13.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, in subsection (a), inserted “firm” in the middle of paragraph (a)(1) and near the beginning of the last undesignated paragraph, substituted “consumers” for “residential customers” in the middle of paragraph (a)(2), and deleted the former last sentence of the last undesignated paragraph which read: “The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to a delivery group for which customer assignment occurred more than four years prior to the date of notice of the expedited hearing.”; substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions which read: “If, in an expedited hearing pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the ‘Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,’ the commission determines that market conditions are no longer competitive, then the commission, on an emergency basis, may by order temporarily impose such directives on marketers as are required to protect the interests of retail customers in the state, including, but not limited to, price regulations on the marketers. For purposes of this subsection, market conditions shall be considered competitive as long as there are at least three marketers soliciting and providing distribution services to residential and small business customers in this state; provided, however, that, in any case where there are three or less marketers soliciting and providing distribution services to residential and small business customers in this state, market conditions shall not be considered competitive if the commission upon clear and convincing evidence determines that as a result of collusion among such marketers, prices for natural gas paid by retail customers are not being adequately constrained by market forces and are significantly higher than such prices would be if they were constrained by market forces. In no event shall such emergency directives extend beyond the first day of July immediately following the next full annual session of the General Assembly after the imposition of such directives. Any such directives shall be drawn as narrowly as possible to accomplish the purpose of protecting the public on an interim basis. Such directives shall be immediately review able in the Superior Court of Fulton County in the same manner and subject to the same procedures as the review of any other contested case under the provisions of Code Section 50-13-19.”; and added subsections (c) and (d).

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1084, § 2, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1206, § 2. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to O.C.G.A. § 46-5-157, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 273 (2001).

For note on the 2001 amendment to O.C.G.A. §

46-4-157

, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 277 (2001).

46-4-158.
Obligations of an electing distribution company; conditions.

An electing distribution company which provides firm distribution service under this article must:

Offer an allocation of such distribution service to marketers separately from any commodity sales service or other service;

Provide such allocation of such distribution service to marketers without undue discrimination or preference, including undue discrimination or preference in the quality of service provided, the duration of service, the categories, prices, or volumes of natural gas to be distributed, customer classification, or other undue discrimination or preference of any kind;

Provide all marketers with equal and timely access to information relevant to the availability of such service, including without limitation the availability of capacity at delivery points, through the use of an electronic bulletin board; and

Cooperate with each certificated marketer and each regulated provider of natural gas to achieve the intentions of this article set out in subsection (b) of Code Section 46-4-151.

An electing distribution company may impose reasonable operational conditions on any firm distribution service provided to marketers under this article. Such conditions must be filed by the electing firm distribution company as part of its firm distribution tariff.

An electing distribution company which allocates firm distribution service to marketers under this article is not required to provide any requested firm distribution service for which capacity is not available or that would require the construction or acquisition of any new facilities.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-158

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 14.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, in subsection (a), deleted “and” from the end of paragraph (a)(2), substituted “; and” for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(3), and added paragraph (a)(4).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”